Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-164
Banking, law, and agricultural services; not prohibited.

Nothing contained in the Public Accountancy Act shall prohibit any person from carrying on the regular business of banking, nor prohibit any person from carrying on the regular practice of law, nor prohibit any farm organization or agricultural cooperative association, or the employees thereof, from rendering accounting, auditing, or business analysis services when such services are rendered only to its members or to other farm organizations or agricultural cooperative associations.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 59, p. 76;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 55.